Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.20.050

Revising monetary contribution limits, reporting thresholds, and code values. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

At least once every five years, but no more often than every two years, the commission must consider whether to revise the monetary contribution limits and reporting thresholds and code values of this title. If the commission chooses to make revisions, the revisions shall be only for the purpose of recognizing economic changes as reflected by an inflationary index recommended by the office of financial management, and may be rounded off to amounts as determined by the commission to be most accessible for public understanding. The revisions shall be guided by the change in the index for the period commencing with the month of December preceding the last revision and concluding with the month of December preceding the month the revision is adopted. As to each of the three general categories of this title, reports of campaign finance, reports of lobbyist activity, and reports of the financial affairs of elected and appointed officials, the revisions shall equally affect all thresholds within each category. The revisions authorized by this subsection shall reflect economic changes from the time of the last legislative enactment affecting the respective code or threshold.

Revisions made in accordance with this section shall be adopted as rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW.

[ 2024 c 164 s 411; 2019 c 428 s 11; 2011 c 60 s 21; 2010 c 204 s 305; 1993 c 2 s 9 (Initiative Measure No. 134, approved November 3, 1992). Formerly RCW 42.17A.125, 42.17.690.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Finding—Effective date—2019 c 428: See notes following RCW 29B.20.110.

Effective date—2011 c 60: See note following RCW 29B.20.030.

Effective date—2010 c 204 ss 101-504, 506-601, 603-702, and 801-1103: See note following RCW 29B.15.010.

Short title—1993 c 2: See note following RCW 29B.40.010.